Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
SUBPART 2
DISSOLUTION UPON EXPIRATION OF TERM
OR OF DELINQUENT ENTITY

7-90-907. Dissolution upon expiration of term - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire part added, p. 1214, § 20, effective October 1.

L. 2010:

(1) repealed, (HB 10-1403), ch. 404, p. 1999, § 23, effective August 11.

L. 2019:

(2)(b) added by revision, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, pp. 1922, 1966, §§ 22, 72.

7-90-908. Dissolution of delinquent entity.

If a delinquent domestic entity has failed to cure its delinquency for three years or more, any manager of the domestic entity may cause it to dissolve by delivering to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article, a statement of dissolution of delinquent entity stating:

The domestic entity name of the delinquent entity;

The principal office address of the delinquent entity's principal office;

That the entity is delinquent and has failed to cure its delinquency for three years or more; and

That, at least thirty days prior to the delivery of the statement of dissolution of delinquent entity to the secretary of state, the delinquent entity has delivered written notice of the delinquent entity's plan to file a statement of dissolution of delinquent entity to all owners and other persons having authority under the organic statutes and under its constituent operating document to bring about or prevent dissolution of the entity and the delinquent entity has not received, as of the date the statement of dissolution of delinquent entity is delivered for filing to the secretary of state, written objections to dissolution from such number of such owners and other persons as would be sufficient to prevent voluntary dissolution of the delinquent entity under the organic statutes and its constituent operating document.

A delinquent domestic entity is dissolved upon the effective date of its statement of dissolution of delinquent entity.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire part added, p. 1215, § 20, effective October 1.

7-90-909. Notice of dissolution upon expiration of term. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire part added, p. 1215, § 20, effective October 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section repealed, (HB 10-1403), ch. 404, p. 2000, § 24, effective August 11.

7-90-910. Effect of dissolution under section 7-90-908.

A domestic entity that is dissolved pursuant to section 7-90-908 continues its existence but may not carry on any business except as is appropriate to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs, and to give notice to claimants, in accordance with the organic statutes.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire part added, p. 1215, § 20, effective October 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 244, § 40, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1922, § 23, effective July 1, 2020.